Hawaii statutes.
§651-37 Address, signature. All writs
of execution, whether civil or criminal, issuing from any court of record,
shall be addressed to the sheriff, or deputy sheriff, or a police officer of
any county, and shall be signed by the clerk of the court, and impressed with
the seal thereof. [CC 1859, §1020; RL 1925, §2441; RL 1935, §4140; am L 1939, c
104, §7; am L 1943, c 62, §21 and c 64, §22; RL 1945, §10167; RL 1955, §233-36;
am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §651-37; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next